Georgia statutes. TITLE 46 Public Utilities and Public Transportation
PART 3 Issuance or Sale of Tickets for Passage on Vessels

46-9-170.
Failure of person issuing or selling passenger tickets on board vessel to include country of registry on advertisement, circular, or other printed paper in regard to passage.

No person issuing, selling, or offering to sell any passenger ticket on board any vessel, including the owner or consignee of such vessel or his agents, servants, or employees, shall omit reference to the country of registry of such vessel from any advertisement, circular, circular letter, pamphlet, card, handbill, or other printed paper, or from any other notice, whether written or oral, in regard to such passage, ticket, or instrument of passage or voyage to which it entitles or purports to entitle its owner, purchaser, or holder or the line over which or the vessel for which such passage is sold or offered or as to his agency for such line or vessel. Such reference shall be no less prominently displayed than the balance of the material appearing on the printed paper or other notice.

History.

Ga. L. 1966, p. 26, § 1.

46-9-171.
Contents of tickets, certificates, orders, or receipts issued as evidence of a right of passage on the high seas; required signatures on such tickets, certificates, orders, or receipts.

A ticket or instrument issued as evidence of a right of passage on the high seas from any port in this state to any port of any other state or nation, every certificate or order issued for the purpose or under pretense of procuring such ticket or instrument, and every receipt for money paid for such ticket or instrument must state:

The name of the vessel on which the passage is to be made;

The name of the owners or consignees of such vessel;

The name of the company or line, if any, to which such vessel belongs;

Its country of registry;

The place from which such passage is to commence;

The place where such passage is to terminate;

The day of the month and year upon which the voyage is to commence; and

The name of the person purchasing such ticket or instrument or receiving such order, certificate, or receipt and the amount paid therefor.

Any such ticket, instrument, order, certificate, or receipt, unless sold or issued by the owners or consignees of such vessel, must be signed by their authorized agent.

History.

Ga. L. 1966, p. 26, § 2.

46-9-172.
Penalty.

Any person, partnership, association, firm, agency, or corporation violating any provision of this part shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, provided that no violator shall be fined less than $500.00 for each violation.

History.

Ga. L. 1966, p. 26, § 3.